Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 2 Regulation of Fire and Other Hazards to Persons and Property Generally
25-2-14.
Buildings presenting special hazards to persons or property — Requirement and issuance of building permits and certificates of occupancy; fees; employment of private professional providers to perform building plan reviews.

Plans and specifications for all proposed buildings which come under classification in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-2-13 and which come under the jurisdiction of the office of the Commissioner pursuant to Code Section 25-2-12 shall be submitted to and receive approval by either the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, or state inspector before any state, municipal, or county building permit may be issued or construction started. All such plans and specifications submitted as required by this subsection shall be accompanied by a fee in the amount provided in Code Section 25-2-4.1 and shall bear the seal and Georgia registration number of the drafting architect or engineer or shall otherwise have the approval of the Commissioner.

If the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official cannot provide plan review within 30 business days of receiving a written application for permitting in accordance with the code official’s plan submittal process, then, in lieu of plan review by personnel employed by such governing authority, any person, firm, or corporation engaged in a construction project which requires plan review, regardless if the plan review is required by subsection (a) of this Code section or by local county or municipal ordinance, shall have the option of retaining, at its own expense, a private professional provider to provide the required plan review. As used in this paragraph, the term “private professional provider” means a professional engineer who holds a certificate of registration issued under Chapter 15 of Title 43 or a professional architect who holds a certificate of registration issued under Chapter 4 of Title 43, who is not an employee of or otherwise affiliated with or financially interested in the person, firm, or corporation engaged in the construction project to be reviewed.

The state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official shall advise the permit applicant at the time the complete submittal application for a permit in accordance with the code official’s plan submittal process is received that the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official intends to complete the required plan review within the time prescribed by this paragraph or that the applicant may immediately secure the services of a private professional provider to complete the required plan review pursuant to this subsection. The plan submittal process shall include those procedures and approvals required by the local jurisdiction before plan review can take place. If the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official states its intent to complete the required plan review within the time prescribed by this paragraph, the applicant shall not be authorized to use the services of a private professional provider as provided in this subsection. The permit applicant and the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official may agree by mutual consent to extend the time period prescribed by this paragraph for plan review if the characteristics of the project warrant such an extension. However, if the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official states its intent to complete the required plan review within the time prescribed by this paragraph, or any extension thereof mutually agreed to by the applicant and the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official and does not permit the applicant to use the services of a private professional provider and the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official fails to complete such plan review in the time prescribed by this paragraph, or any extension thereof mutually agreed to by the applicant and the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official, the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official shall issue the applicant a project initiation permit to allow the applicant to begin work on the project, provided that portion of the initial phase of work is compliant with applicable codes, laws, and rules. If a full permit is not issued for the portion requested for permitting, then the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official shall have an additional 20 business days to complete the review and issue the full permit. If the plans submitted for permitting are denied for any deficiency, the time frames and process for resubmittal shall be governed by divisions (2)(H)(iii) through (2)(H)(v) of this subsection.

Any plan review or inspection conducted by a private professional provider shall be no less extensive than plan reviews or inspections conducted by state, county, or municipal personnel responsible for review of plans for compliance with the state’s minimum fire safety standards and, where applicable, the state’s minimum accessibility standards.

The person, firm, or corporation retaining a private professional provider to conduct a plan review shall be required to pay to the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official which requires the plan review the same regulatory fees and charges which would have been required had the plan review been conducted by the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official.

A private professional provider performing plan reviews under this subsection shall review construction plans to determine compliance with the state’s minimum fire safety standards in effect which were adopted pursuant to this chapter and, where applicable, the state’s minimum accessibility standards adopted pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 30. Upon determining that the plans reviewed comply with the applicable codes and standards as adopted, such private professional provider shall prepare an affidavit or affidavits on a form prescribed by the Safety Fire Commissioner certifying under oath that the following is true and correct to the best of such private professional provider’s knowledge and belief and in accordance with the applicable professional standard of care:

The plans were reviewed by the affiant who is duly authorized to perform plan review pursuant to this subsection and who holds the appropriate license or certifications and insurance coverage and insurance coverage stipulated in this subsection; and

The plans comply with the state’s minimum fire safety standards in effect which were adopted pursuant to this chapter and, where applicable, the state’s minimum accessibility standards adopted pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 30.

All private professional providers providing plan review services pursuant to this subsection shall secure and maintain insurance coverage for professional liability (errors and omissions) insurance. The limits of such insurance shall be not less than $1 million per claim and $1 million in aggregate coverage. Such insurance may be a practice policy or project-specific coverage. If the insurance is a practice policy, it shall contain prior acts coverage for the private professional provider. If the insurance is project-specific, it shall continue in effect for two years following the issuance of the certificate of final completion for the project. The state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official may establish, for private professional providers working within their respective jurisdictions specified by this chapter, a system of registration listing the private professional providers within their areas of competency and verifying compliance with the insurance requirements of this subsection.

The private professional provider shall be empowered to perform any plan review required by the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official, regardless if the plan review is required by this subsection or by local county or municipal ordinance, provided that the plan review is within the scope of such private professional provider’s area of expertise and competency. This subsection shall not apply to hospitals, ambulatory health care centers, nursing homes, jails, penal institutions, airports, buildings or structures that impact national or state homeland security, or any building defined as a high-rise building in the State Minimum Standards Code, provided that interior tenant build-out projects within high-rise buildings are not exempt from this subsection, or plans related to Code Section 25-2-16 or 25-2-17 or Chapter 8, 9, or 10 of this title.

The permit applicant shall submit a copy of the private professional provider’s plan review report to the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official. Such plan review report shall include at a minimum all of the following:

The affidavit of the private professional provider required pursuant to this subsection;

The applicable fees required for permitting;

Other documents deemed necessary due to unusual construction or design, smoke removal systems where applicable with engineering analysis, and additional documentation required where performance based code options are used; and

Any documents required by the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official to determine that the permit applicant has secured all other governmental approvals required by law.

No more than 30 business days after receipt of a permit application and the private professional provider’s plan review report required pursuant to this subsection, the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official shall issue the requested permit or provide written notice to the permit applicant identifying the specific plan features that do not comply with the applicable codes or standards, as well as the specific reference to the relevant requirements. If the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official does not provide a written notice of the plan deficiencies within the prescribed 30 day period, the permit application shall be deemed approved as a matter of law and the permit shall be issued by the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official on the next business day.

If the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official provides a written notice of plan deficiencies to the permit applicant within the prescribed 30 day period, the 30 day period shall be tolled pending resolution of the matter. To resolve the plan deficiencies, the permit applicant may elect to dispute the deficiencies pursuant to this chapter, the promulgated rules and regulations adopted thereunder, or, where appropriate for existing buildings, the local governing authority’s appeals process or the permit applicant may submit revisions to correct the deficiencies.

If the permit applicant submits revisions, the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official shall have the remainder of the tolled 30 day period plus an additional five business days to issue the requested permit or to provide a second written notice to the permit applicant stating which of the previously identified plan features remain in noncompliance with the applicable codes or standards, with specific reference to the relevant requirements. If the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official does not provide the second written notice within the prescribed time period, the permit shall be issued by the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official on the next business day.

If the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official provides a second written notice of plan deficiencies to the permit applicant within the prescribed time period, the permit applicant may elect to dispute the deficiencies pursuant to this chapter, the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, or, where applicable for existing buildings, the local governing authority’s appeals process or the permit applicant may submit additional revisions to correct the deficiencies. For all revisions submitted after the first revision, the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official shall have an additional five business days to issue the requested permit or to provide a written notice to the permit applicant stating which of the previously identified plan features remain in noncompliance with the applicable codes or standards, with specific reference to the relevant requirements.

The state fire marshal may provide for the prequalification of private professional providers who may perform plan reviews pursuant to this subsection by rule or regulation authorized in Code Section 25-2-4. In addition, any local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official may provide for the prequalification of private professional providers who may perform plan reviews pursuant to this subsection; however, no additional local ordinance implementing prequalification shall become effective until notice of the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official’s intent to require prequalification and the specific requirements for prequalification have been advertised in the newspaper in which the sheriff’s advertisements for that locality are published. The ordinance implementing prequalification shall provide for evaluation of the qualifications of a private professional provider only on the basis of the private professional provider’s expertise with respect to the objectives of this subsection, as demonstrated by the private professional provider’s experience, education, and training. Such ordinance may require a private professional provider to hold additional certifications, provided that such certifications are required by ordinance or state law for plan review personnel currently directly employed by such local governing authority.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit any public or private right of action designed to provide protection, rights, or remedies for consumers.

If the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official determines that the building construction or plans do not comply with the applicable codes or standards, the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official may deny the permit or request for a certificate of occupancy or certificate of completion, as appropriate, or may issue a stop-work order for the project or any portion thereof as provided by law or rule or regulation, after giving notice and opportunity to remedy the violation, if the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official determines that noncompliance exists with state laws, adopted codes or standards, or local ordinances, provided that:

The state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official shall be available to meet with the private professional provider within two business days to resolve any dispute after issuing a stop-work order or providing notice to the applicant denying a permit or request for a certificate of occupancy or certificate of completion; and

If the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official and the private professional provider are unable to resolve the dispute, the matter shall be referred to the local enforcement agency’s board of appeals, except as provided in Code Section 25-2-12 and appeals for those proposed buildings classified under paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-2-13 or any existing building under the specific jurisdiction of the state fire marshal’s office shall be made to the state fire marshal and further appeal shall be under Code Section 25-2-10.

The state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, local government, designated code official enforcement personnel, or agents of the governing authority shall be immune from liability to any person or party for any action or inaction by an owner of a building or by a private professional provider or its duly authorized representative in connection with building plan review services by private professional providers as provided in this subsection.

Except as provided in this paragraph, no proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official shall adopt or enforce any rules, procedures, policies, or standards more stringent than those prescribed in this subsection related to private professional provider services.

Nothing in this subsection shall limit the authority of the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official to issue a stop-work order for a building project or any portion of such project, as provided by law or rule or regulation authorized pursuant to Code Section 25-2-4, after giving notice and opportunity to remedy the violation, if the official determines that a condition on the building site constitutes an immediate threat to public safety and welfare.

When performing building code plan reviews related to determining compliance with the Georgia State Minimum Standard Codes most recently adopted by the Department of Community Affairs, the state’s minimum fire safety standards adopted by the safety fire marshal, or the state’s minimum accessibility standards pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 30, a private professional provider is subject to the disciplinary guidelines of the applicable professional licensing board with jurisdiction over such private professional provider’s license or certification under Chapters 4 and 15 of Title 43, as applicable. Any complaint processing, investigation, and discipline that arise out of a private professional provider’s performance of the adopted building, fire safety, or accessibility codes or standards plan review services shall be conducted by the applicable professional licensing board or as allowed by state rule or regulation. Notwithstanding any disciplinary rules of the applicable professional licensing board with jurisdiction over such private professional provider’s license or certification under Chapters 4 and 15 of Title 43, the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official enforcement personnel may decline to accept building plan reviews submitted by any private professional provider who has submitted multiple reports which required revisions due to negligence, noncompliance, or deficiencies.

A complete set of approved plans and specifications shall be maintained on the construction site, and construction shall proceed in compliance with the minimum fire safety standards under which such plans and specifications were approved. The owner of any such building or structure or his authorized representative shall notify the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, or state inspector upon completion of approximately 80 percent of the construction thereof and shall apply for a certificate of occupancy when construction of such building or structure is completed.

Every building or structure which comes under classification in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-2-13 and which comes under the jurisdiction of the office of the Commissioner pursuant to Code Section 25-2-12 shall have a certificate of occupancy issued by the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, or the state inspector before such building or structure may be occupied. Such certificates of occupancy shall be issued for each business establishment within the building, shall carry a charge in the amount provided in Code Section 25-2-4.1, shall state the occupant load for such business establishment or building, shall be posted in a prominent location within such business establishment or building, and shall run for the life of the building, except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section.

For purposes of this chapter, any existing building or structure listed in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-2-13 and which comes under the jurisdiction of the office of the Commissioner pursuant to Code Section 25-2-12 shall be deemed to be a proposed building in the event such building or structure is subject to substantial renovation, a fire or other hazard of serious consequence, or a change in the classification of occupancy. For purposes of this subsection, the term “substantial renovation” means any construction project involving exits or internal features of such building or structure costing more than the building’s or structure’s assessed value according to county tax records at the time of such renovation.

In cases where the governing authority of a municipality which is enforcing the fire safety standards pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 25-2-12 contracts with the office of the Commissioner for the enforcement of fire safety standards, the office of the Commissioner shall not charge such municipality fees in excess of those charged in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 9; Ga. L. 1967, p. 619, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1779, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 25; Ga. L. 1982, p. 479, §§ 3, 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2186, § 5; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2725, § 5; Ga. L. 2006, p. 506, § 2/HB 1385.

25-2-14.1.
Buildings presenting special hazards to persons or property — Compliance of existing and proposed buildings and structures with minimum fire safety standards.

Every building and structure existing as of April 1, 1968, which building or structure is listed in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-2-13 shall comply with the minimum fire safety standards adopted in the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter which were in effect at the time such building or structure was constructed, except that any nonconformance noted under the electrical standards adopted at the time such building or structure was constructed shall be corrected in accordance with the current electrical standards adopted pursuant to this chapter. A less restrictive provision contained in any subsequently adopted minimum fire safety standard may be applied to any existing building or structure.

Every proposed building and structure listed in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-2-13 shall comply with the adopted minimum fire safety standards that were in effect on the date that plans and specifications therefor were received by the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, or state inspector for review and approval.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1779, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 815, § 3.

25-2-14.2.
Authority of state fire marshal or other officials to deny permit or
certificate of occupancy, or issue stop-work order for regulatory noncompliance.

As used in this Code section, the term “written notification” means a typed, printed, or handwritten notice citing the specific sections of the applicable codes or standards that have been violated and describing specifically where and how the design or construction is noncompliant with such codes or standards.

If the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official determines that the building construction or plans for any building or structure, which are required under this chapter to meet the state minimum fire safety standards, do not comply with any such applicable codes or standards, the state fire marshal, the proper local fire marshal, state inspector, or designated code official may deny a permit or request for a certificate of occupancy or certificate of completion, as appropriate, or may issue a stop-work order for the project or any portion thereof as provided by law or rule or regulation, after giving written notification and opportunity to remedy the violation.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-2-14.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 379, § 1/SB 305.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2014. See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 379, § 2/SB 305, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Code section shall be applicable to any application for a permit, request for a certificate of occupancy or certificate of completion, and stop work order submitted or issued on or after July 1, 2014.

25-2-15.
Buildings presenting special hazards to persons or property — Issuance of temporary occupancy permits; time limits for compliance with chapter.

In existing buildings which come under the classification in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-2-13, when substandard conditions are found, a temporary occupancy permit may be issued, such permit carrying a time limit adjusted to meet the amount of time deemed necessary to make the proper corrections in order to bring the building up to standard. All certificates of occupancy shall be issued against the building and shall not require renewal because of change of ownership. The same set of fees for certificates of occupancy as are applicable to proposed buildings covered in Code Section 25-2-14 shall apply. The Commissioner and his delegated authorities shall determine the time limit for complying with any of the standards established pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 10; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 25.

25-2-16.
Regulation of the storage, transportation, and handling of hazardous materials; use of hold-open latches at self-service gasoline stations; plans for bulk storage facilities.

Some substances constitute a special hazard to property and to the life and safety of persons because of certain characteristics and properties incident to their storage, handling, and transportation. Substances presenting such a special hazard include gasoline, kerosene, and other flammable liquids; liquefied petroleum gases; welding and other gases; dry-cleaning fluids; anhydrous ammonia; and other gases, liquids, or solids of a highly flammable or hazardous nature.

Every person who stores, transports, or handles any of the hazardous substances listed in subsection (a) of this Code section shall so store, transport, and handle the substances as to afford every precaution and protection as may be found by the Commissioner to be reasonable and practical to avoid injury to persons from exposure, fire, or explosion caused by the storage, transportation, or handling of these substances, including transportation thereof only in vehicles which are in proper condition for that purpose.

The Commissioner is directed to investigate the nature and properties of such hazardous substances and the known precautionary and protective techniques for their storage, transportation, and handling, including, but not limited to, the codes and standards adopted, recommended, or issued by the National Fire Protection Association and the Agricultural Nitrogen Institute. Based upon the investigation, the Commissioner is authorized to determine and by rule to provide what precautionary and protective techniques are reasonable and practical measures for the prevention of injury to persons and property from the storage, transportation, and handling of such highly flammable or hazardous substances. Such authorization shall include the power to provide, by rule, the minimum standards that a vehicle shall meet before it is considered to be in proper condition to transport the material. No person shall transport any such material or substance in bulk unless the vehicle in which it is transported is in the proper condition, as provided by such rules, to transport the material with reasonable safety.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Automatic-closing device” means a gasoline or diesel fuel pump nozzle which contains a valve which automatically shuts off the flow of gasoline or diesel fuel through the nozzle when the level of gasoline in a motor vehicle fuel tank reaches a certain level.

“Hold-open latch” means a device which attaches to a gasoline or diesel fuel pump nozzle, which device mechanically holds the nozzle and valve in an open position.

“Self-service station” means any place of business which sells gasoline or diesel fuel at retail and which allows customers to dispense the fuel.

No self-service station shall be prohibited from installing and no customer at such station shall be prohibited from using hold-open latches on gasoline or diesel fuel pumps available for operation by the customer. However, if hold-open latches are used on pumps operated by the customer, such pumps shall be equipped with a functioning automatic-closing device.

Plans and specifications for all proposed bulk storage facilities which come under classification in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be submitted to and receive approval by the state fire marshal and the proper local fire marshal before construction is started. All such plans and specifications submitted as required by this subsection shall be accompanied by a $100.00 fee for screening and shall bear the seal and Georgia registration number of the drafting architect or engineer or shall otherwise have the approval of the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 12; Ga. L. 1967, p. 619, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1084, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 476, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2186, § 6.

Cross references.

Hazardous waste management generally, §

12-8-60

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and Regulations for Flammable and Combustible Liquids, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations for the State of Georgia, Comptroller General, Chapter 120-3-11.

Rules and Regulations for the Storage and Handling of Anhydrous Ammonia, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Comptroller General, Chapter 120-3-12.

Rules and Regulations for Welding Cases, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Comptroller General, Chapter 120-3-13.

25-2-17.
Regulation of explosives.

As used in this Code section, the term “explosive” or “explosives” means any chemical compound or mechanical mixture which is commonly used or intended for the purpose of producing an explosion, which compound or mixture contains any oxidizing and combustible units or other ingredients in such proportions, quantities, or packing that an ignition by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or by detonator of any part of the compound or mixture may cause such a sudden generation of highly heated gases that the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of producing destructive effects on contiguous objects or of destroying life or limb. Explosives constitute a special hazard to life and safety of persons because of the danger incident to their manufacture, transportation, use, sale, and storage.

Every person who manufactures, transports, uses, sells, or stores explosives shall so manufacture, transport, use, sell, and store them as to afford every precaution and protection against injury to persons as the Commissioner may determine and by rule declare to be reasonable and practical; provided, however, that nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to extend to storage, use, or sale of small arms ammunition.

The Commissioner is directed to investigate and examine the nature and properties of various explosives and known safety and protective techniques, including the safety standards, recommendations, and codes of the National Fire Protection Association (Explosives Ordinance, National Fire Code), and the American Insurance Association, the successor to the National Board of Fire Underwriters. Based upon the investigation, the Commissioner is authorized to determine and by rule to provide what reasonable and practical protection must be afforded persons with respect to the manufacture, transportation, use, sale, and storage of explosives.

No person shall manufacture, transport, use, sell, or store explosives without having first obtained a license therefor issued by the Commissioner in accordance with reasonable rules established by him. The Commissioner is authorized to make reasonable rules providing for the issuance of such licenses on an annual basis to those applicants who have observed and may be expected to observe safety rules lawfully made under this Code section. Graded fees for such licenses shall be as provided in Code Section 25-2-4.1. The permits for the use only of explosives may be issued by judges of the probate courts or other local elected officials whom the Commissioner may designate. Fees for such permits to use explosives shall be $2.00 for each permit issued, which fee shall be retained by the issuing local official.

Every person licensed under this Code section who suffers a larceny or attempted larceny of primer cord, blasting agents, powders, and dynamite shall make a report thereof to local law enforcement agencies and to the state fire marshal, in accordance with rules made by the Commissioner. The Commissioner is authorized to make such rules.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 13; Ga. L. 1967, p. 619, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2186, § 7; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2725, § 6.

Cross references.

Regulation of fireworks, T. 25, C. 10.

25-2-18.
Exemption of public buildings from fees or licenses; waiver for churches and charities.

All federal, state, county, or city publicly owned buildings covered by this chapter are exempt from any fee or license which may be specified in this chapter. Such fees or licenses may be waived where chargeable to churches and charitable organizations.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 31.

25-2-19.
Regulation of fire hazards in hotels, apartment houses, department stores, warehouses, and public places.

The Commissioner shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations governing and regulating fire hazards in hotels, apartment houses, department stores, warehouses, storage places, and places of public assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 17.

Cross references.

Operators of hotels, inns, and roadhouses generally, T. 43, C. 21.

25-2-20.
Licensing of traveling carnivals, circuses, and other exhibits.

All traveling motion picture shows, carnivals, and circuses shall obtain a fire prevention regulatory license from the state fire marshal based upon compliance with this chapter, as set forth in rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner. The fee for the license shall be $150.00 for each calendar year or part thereof, payable to the state fire marshal, who shall pay the same into the state treasury.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-50.1/HB 1055.

Cross references.

Regulation of activities of carnivals, road shows, tent shows, and other itinerant entertainment, §

43-1-15

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and Regulations of Fire Prevention Inspection and Licensing of Carnivals and Circuses, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Comptroller General, Chapter 120-3-4.

25-2-21.
[Reserved] Investigation on complaint of dangerous building appurtenances; effect of failure to remove or repair after notice.

History.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 25/HB 79, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective April 24, 2013; repealed by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1779, § 9, effective April 1, 1982.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1779, § 9 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 1, 1982.

25-2-22.
Right of Commissioner and other authorized officials to enter and inspect buildings and premises.

The Commissioner and the various officials delegated by him to carry out this chapter shall have the authority at all times of the day and night to enter in or upon and to examine any building or premises where a fire is in progress or has occurred, as well as other buildings or premises adjacent to or near the same. The Commissioner and his delegated authorities shall have the right to enter in and upon all buildings and premises subject to this chapter, at any reasonable time, for the purpose of examination or inspection.

Upon complaint submitted in writing, the Commissioner and the various officials to whom enforcement authority is delegated under this chapter may enter in or upon any building or premises between the hours of sunrise and sunset for the purpose of investigating the complaint. Upon the complaint of any person, the state fire marshal or his deputized officials may inspect or cause to be inspected all buildings and premises within their jurisdiction whenever he or they deem it necessary.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 20.